Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 314.698 is amended to read:
314.698. For purposes of ORS 317.267,  amounts of [ global intangible low-taxed ] net controlled
foreign corporation tested  income described in section 951A of the Internal Revenue Code and
included in gross income shall be treated in the same manner as a dividend.
SECTION 2.  ORS 317.267 is amended to read:
317.267. (1) To derive Oregon taxable income, there shall be added to federal taxable income:
(a) Amounts received as dividends from corporations  deducted for federal purposes pursuant to
section 243 or 245 of the Internal  Revenue Code, except section 245(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(b) Amounts deducted for income repatriated, deemed or otherwise, under section  965 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(c) Amounts deducted as [ global intangible low-taxed ] net controlled foreign corporation
tested income pursuant to section 250 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(d) Amounts  paid as dividends by a public utility or telecommunications utility and deducted for
federal purposes pursuant to section 247 of the Internal Revenue Code; or
(e) Dividends eliminated under Treasury Regulations adopted under  section 1502 of the Internal
Revenue Code that  are paid by members of an affiliated group that are eliminated from a consol-
idated federal return pursuant to ORS 317.715 (2).
(2) To derive Oregon taxable income,  after the modification prescribed under subsection (1) of
this section, there shall be subtracted from federal taxable income  an amount equal to 70 percent
of dividends (determined without regard to section 78 of the Internal Revenue  Code) received or
deemed received from corporations if such dividends are included in federal  taxable income. How-
ever:
(a) In the case of any dividend on debt-financed  portfolio stock as described in section 246A of
the Internal Revenue Code,  the subtraction allowed under this subsection shall be reduced under the
same conditions and in same amount as the dividends  received deduction otherwise allowable for
federal income tax purposes is reduced under section 246A of the Internal Revenue Code.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-A) Page 1
(b) In the case of any dividend received from  a 20 percent owned corporation, as defined in
section 243(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, or [ global intangible low-taxed ] net controlled foreign
corporation tested  income included in gross income  pursuant to section 951A of the Internal Re-
venue Code, this subsection shall be applied by substituting “80 percent” for “70 percent.”
(c) A dividend that is not treated as a dividend  under section 243(d) of the Internal Revenue
Code may not be treated as a dividend for purposes of this subsection.
(d) If a dividends received deduction is  not allowed for federal tax purposes because of section
246(a) or (c) of the  Internal Revenue Code, a subtraction may not be made under this subsection for
received dividends that are described in section 246(a) or (c) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(e) In the case of any dividend received from an alien,  domestic or foreign insurer, as defined
in ORS  731.082, that would be included in the taxpayer’s consolidated Oregon return but for the
application of ORS 317.710 (5) or (7), this subsection shall be  applied by substituting “100 percent”
for “70 percent.”
(f) A subtraction under this subsection is not  allowed for any amount of foreign-source dividend
income, as described in section 245A of the Internal Revenue Code,  that is included in gross income.
(3) There shall be excluded from the sales factor of any apportionment  formula employed to at-
tribute income to this state any amount subtracted from federal taxable income under subsection  (2)
of this section or  deducted under section 245A of the Internal Revenue Code. The amount of any
dividend or of any [ global intangible low-taxed ] net controlled foreign corporation tested  income
that is apportionable shall be determined as  provided by the apportionment formula applicable to
the taxpayer, as provided in ORS 314.280 and 314.605  to 314.675, but may not include any amount
subtracted under subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 3.  Section 32a, chapter 579, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 32a.  The amendments to ORS 315.266 by section  31, chapter 579, Oregon Laws 2019,  [ of
this 2019 Act ] apply to tax years beginning on  or after January 1, 2020[ , and before January 1,
2026].
SECTION 4.  Section 50, chapter 525, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 50.  The amendments to ORS 315.266 by section 49 , chapter 525,  Oregon Laws 2021,  [ of
this 2021 Act ] apply to tax years beginning on  or after January 1, 2022[ , and before January 1,
2026].
SECTION 5.  ORS 284.368 is amended to read:
284.368. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Actual Oregon expenses” means the  costs paid in Oregon for principal photography, pro-
duction or postproduction in Oregon of a film, or  for media production services, including but not
limited to the purchase or rental cost of equipment, food, lodging, real property  and permits and
payments made for salaries, wages and benefits for work in Oregon.
(b) “Film” means a television  movie or one or more episodes of a single television series, [ or]
a movie produced for release to theaters, video or the Internet  or a commercial . “Film”  does not
include the production of [ a commercial or ] one or more segments of a newscast or sporting event.
(c) “Filmmaker” means a person who owns a television or film production company.
(d) “Local filmmaker” means a person who  owns a television or film production company that
has its principal place of business in this state.
(e) “Local media production project” means, if made or performed by a local media  production
services company, a single interactive video game  or a portion thereof, a commercial  or
postproduction services for a single film.
(f) “Local media production services company” means a media  production services company that
has its principal place of business in this state.
(g) “Media production services”  includes postproduction services and interactive video game
development. “Media production services” does not include the production of  [ a commercial or ] one
or more segments of a newscast or sporting event.
(h) “Media production services company”  means a person who is engaged in media production
services.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-A) Page 2
(i) “Portland metropolitan zone” means the area within a 30-mile radius of  the center of the
Burnside Bridge in Portland.
(j) “Resident of this state” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.027.
(2)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department  may reimburse a filmmaker or local media
production services company for  a portion of the actual Oregon expenses incurred by the filmmaker
or local media production services company.
(b) Maximum reimbursement  for a single film or a single local media production project shall
be the total of:
(A) 20 percent  of payments made for employee salaries, wages and benefits for work done in
Oregon; and
(B) 25 percent of all other actual Oregon expenses.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, maximum reimbursement for a  single film
may not exceed 50 percent of total  moneys received by the Oregon Production Investment Fund
during the biennium in which the actual Oregon expenses are incurred.
(d) To qualify for reimbursement under  this subsection, total actual Oregon expenses for a film
or a local media production project must equal or exceed $1 million.
(3)(a) The department may reimburse a local filmmaker  or local media production services
company for all or a portion  of the actual Oregon expenses, up to $1 million, incurred by the local
filmmaker or local media production services company.
(b) To qualify for reimbursement under this subsection:
(A) Total actual Oregon expenses paid for  the film or media production services must be at least
$75,000;
(B) The local filmmaker or local media production services company must have spent  80 percent
of the film’s payroll on employees who are residents of this state; and
(C) The local filmmaker or local media  production services company may have employed or
contracted with a certified public accountant licensed by the Oregon Board of Accountancy  for the
provision of payroll services.
(4) In combination with the reimbursements allowed under  subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
the department may make an additional payment to a filmmaker for one of the following:
(a) A travel and living expenses rebate of $200 per employee per day, for  any day that a film is
shot in Oregon but  entirely outside  the Portland metropolitan zone, not to exceed $10,000 per day
or $50,000 per film; or
(b) An increase of 10 percent of  the amount otherwise allowable under subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, if for at least six days and at least one  day more than half of its total shoot days in
Oregon the film is shot entirely outside the Portland metropolitan zone.
(5) Reimbursement under  this section shall be made from moneys credited to or deposited in the
Oregon Production Investment Fund during the biennium in which the actual Oregon expenses  were
paid or any prior biennium. A reimbursement may not be made to the extent funds are  not available
in the fund to make the reimbursement.
(6)(a) Total actual Oregon expenses supporting a claim for  reimbursement under this section
must be verified by the Oregon Film and Video Office. The filmmaker  or local media production
services company must submit to the office proof of the actual Oregon expenses.  The proof must
include any documentation that may  be required by the office in its discretion to verify the actual
Oregon  expenses.
(b) The office may charge  the filmmaker or local media production services company for costs
reasonably incurred to verify the actual  Oregon expenses, including but not limited to the cost for
a review or audit of the supporting documentation  by an accountant or auditor. The office may re-
quire the department to deduct the costs incurred by the office in performing  its review or audit
from any reimbursement made to the filmmaker or local media production services company under
this section.
(c) The office may adopt rules that establish a procedure for the  submission and verification of
actual Oregon expenses.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-A) Page 3
SECTION 6. The amendments to ORS 284.368 by section 5 of this 2026  Act apply to fiscal
years beginning on or after July 1, 2026.
SECTION 7.  Section 2, chapter 783, Oregon Laws 1979, as amended by  section 1, chapter 583,
Oregon Laws 1987, section 7, chapter 748, Oregon  Laws 1995, section 1, chapter 218, Oregon Laws
2003, section 1, chapter 548, 2009, section 1, chapter 213, Oregon Laws 2013, and section  3, chapter
578, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Cargo containers, as defined  in ORS 307.835, are exempt from taxation for property tax
years beginning on or after July 1, 1974, and before July 1, [ 2026] 2032.
SECTION 8.  ORS 319.245 is amended to read:
319.245. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Indian tribe” means a federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon.
(b) “Tribal entity” means an entity wholly owned by an Indian tribe.
(c) “Tribal member entity” means an entity  wholly owned and operated by an enrolled member
of an Indian tribe.
(2) The first sale, use  or distribution of motor vehicle fuel in this state is exempt from the li-
cense tax imposed under ORS 319.020 (1)(b) if:
(a) The motor vehicle fuel is purchased by an Indian tribe,  tribal entity or tribal member entity
directly or from a dealer that  purchased the motor vehicle fuel in a transaction that would other-
wise be subject to the tax; and
(b) The motor vehicle fuel is delivered  to a service station that is owned by an Indian tribe,
tribal entity or tribal member entity and operated on the  respective Indian tribe’s reservation or
trust land.
(3) In order to be eligible for the exemption under subsection (2) of this section, the  Indian tribe
must:
(a) Impose a tax on the distribution of the motor vehicle fuel at the same rate  as the license tax
imposed under ORS 319.020 (1)(b); and
[(b) Expend the revenue from the tax imposed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection  solely
for uses that are consistent  with the requirements of Article IX, section 3a, of the Oregon Constitution;
and]
[(c)] (b) Certify annually to the Department of Transportation that the Indian tribe  is in com-
pliance with this subsection.
(4) A dealer described in subsection (2)(a) of this section  shall report to the department such
sales of motor vehicle fuel to Indian tribes, tribal entities and tribal member entities.
(5) The  department shall adopt rules prescribing the processes, forms and information that the
forms must include for the certification required under subsection [ (3)(c)] (3)(b) of this section and
the reports required under subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 9.
 Section 3, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section  3, chapter 82,
Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) A pass-through entity may elect to be liable  for and pay a pass-through business al-
ternative income tax if all members of the pass-through entity are:
(a) Individuals subject to the personal income tax imposed under ORS chapter 316; or
(b) Entities that are  pass-through entities owned entirely by individuals subject to the personal
income tax imposed under ORS chapter 316.
(2) The election to pay the pass-through business  alternative income tax is available if consent
is given by all  members of the electing pass-through entity who are members at the time the election
is filed or is made by any officer, manager or member of the  electing pass-through entity who is
authorized, under law or the entity’s organizational documents, to  make the election and who re-
presents to having such authorization under penalties of perjury. The election  shall be made annu-
ally on or before the due date, including extensions, of the pass-through entity’s  return, in the form
and manner prescribed by the Department of Revenue. The election may not be made  retroactively.
The members of a  pass-through entity may revoke an election under this section for a tax year only
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-A) Page 4
on or before the due date of the pass-through entity’s return for that tax  year, and only if the re-
vocation is agreed to by all members who are members at the time of the revocation.
(3)(a) In determining the sum of distributive proceeds and computing  the tax under this section,
a member of a pass-through entity shall add back any  amount of Oregon tax imposed under [ this
chapter] ORS chapter 314  and deducted by the pass-through entity at the entity  level for federal
income tax purposes under section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) Any amount that is added back under this  subsection and that meets the conditions for the
use of elective rates under ORS 316.043 may be treated as qualifying income under ORS 316.043,  in
a proportion determined by the department by rule.
(4) Each pass-through entity that makes an election for a tax year pursuant to this section  shall
annually report to each of its members, for the  tax year, the member’s share of distributive proceeds
and share of tax paid under this section and eligible  for the credit allowed under section 8, chapter
589, Oregon Laws 2021.
(5) The tax imposed on a pass-through  entity pursuant to this section shall be determined with
respect to the sum of each member’s share of distributive proceeds attributable to the pass-through
entity for the tax year.
(6) The rate of the tax imposed by and computed under this section is:
(a) Nine percent of  the first $250,000, or fraction thereof, of the sum of distributive proceeds;
and
(b) Nine and nine-tenths percent of any amount of distributive proceeds in excess of $250,000.
(7) The amount of  pass-through business alternative income tax due from a pass-through entity
in a tax year shall be  exclusive of any amount of tax due and paid by the pass-through entity under
[this chapter ] ORS chapter 314, except  as otherwise provided in sections 2 to 6, chapter 589, Oregon
Laws 2021.
(8) Pass-through entities that have made  an election under this section shall file an entity tax
return. The return shall be accompanied by payment and shall be due on  the date applicable to re-
turns due under ORS chapter 316, as provided in ORS 314.385.
(9) If  a pass-through entity has made an overpayment of tax under this section, the
pass-through entity may elect to  have that overpayment credited against an installment of
estimated tax for the subsequent tax year. The  department shall administer this subsection
in a manner consistent with the treatment of overpayment of income tax under  ORS 316.583.
SECTION 10.
 Section 10, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021, as  amended by section 1, chapter 399,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 10. (1) Sections 3 and  8, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021, apply to tax years beginning on
or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, [ 2026] 2028.
(2) The amendments to section 3, chapter 589, Oregon Laws  2021, by section 9 of this 2026
Act apply to overpayments made before January 31, 2028.
SECTION 11. Section 12, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021, as  amended by section 2, chapter 399,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 12.  The repeal of  sections 3 and 8, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021, by section 11, chapter
589, Oregon Laws 2021, applies to any tax year that begins on or after January 1, 2022, and  before
January 1, [ 2026] 2028, and to which section 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code is not applicable.
SECTION 12.  Section 16, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2022, as amended by  section 5, chapter 52,
Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 16.  (1) The amendments to ORS 284.368 by section 1, chapter 82,  Oregon Laws 2022, apply
to fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2022.
(2) The amendments to sections 3 and  5, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021, by sections 3 and 4,
chapter 82, Oregon  Laws 2022, apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, [ and before
January 1, 2026, ] and to estimated payments due on and after June 15, 2022.
(3) The amendments to section 2, chapter 527, Oregon  Laws 2021, by section 8, chapter 82,
Oregon Laws 2022, apply to applications for precertification under section 4, chapter 527, Oregon
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-A) Page 5
Laws 2021, and applications for exemption under  section 5, chapter 527, Oregon Laws 2021, without
precertification, filed on or after June 3, 2022.
(4) [ Section 10,  chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2022, ] ORS 317A.123  applies to tax years beginning on
or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2026.
(5) [ Sections 13  and 15, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2022, ] ORS 316.031 and 317.346  apply to tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2029, and  to any tax year to
which a net operating loss arising in those tax years is carried back.
SECTION 13.  ORS 673.605 is amended to read:
673.605. As used in ORS 673.605 to 673.740 unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Board” means the State Board of Tax Practitioners created by ORS 673.725.
(2) “Enrolled agent”  means an individual authorized by and in good standing with the
United States Department of the  Treasury to represent taxpayers before the Internal Re-
venue Service under 31 C.F.R. part 10.
[(2)(a)] (3)(a)  “Facilitator” means a person that individually or in conjunction or  cooperation
with another person processes, receives or accepts for  delivery an application for a refund antic-
ipation loan  or a check in payment of refund anticipation loan proceeds or in any other manner
materially facilitates the making of a refund anticipation loan.
(b) “Facilitator” does not mean a financial institution as  defined in ORS 706.008, a person who
has been issued a license under ORS chapter 725, an affiliate  that is a servicer for a financial in-
stitution or for a person issued a license under ORS chapter 725, a person issued a  license as a
certified public accountant  or public accountant by the Oregon Board of Accountancy, or any per-
son that  acts solely as an intermediary and does not deal with a taxpayer in the making of a refund
anticipation  loan.
[(3)] (4)  “Lender” means a person that makes a refund  anticipation loan with the person’s own
funds or a line of credit or other funding from a  financial institution as defined in ORS 706.008, but
does not include a financial institution as defined in ORS 706.008.
[(4)] (5) “Refund anticipation loan” means a loan that the lender arranges to be  repaid directly
from the proceeds of the taxpayer’s federal or state personal income tax refund.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a)  “Refund anticipation loan fee” means the charges, fees or other consideration
charged or imposed by the lender or facilitator for the making of a refund anticipation loan.
(b) “Refund anticipation loan fee” does not mean any  charge, fee or other consideration usually
charged or imposed by the facilitator in  the ordinary course of business for nonloan services, in-
cluding fees for tax return preparation and fees for electronic filing of tax returns.
[(6)] (7) “Registered tax aide” means any person who is registered under ORS 673.605 to 673.740
as a registered tax aide.
[(7)] (8)  “Tax consultant” means a  person who is licensed under ORS 673.605 to 673.740 to pre-
pare or advise  or assist in the preparation of personal income tax returns for another and for val-
uable consideration.
[(8)] (9)  “Taxpayer” means an individual who files a federal  or Oregon personal income tax re-
turn.
[(9)] (10) “Tax preparer” means any person who is licensed under ORS 673.605 to 673.740 as  a
tax preparer.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 673.610 is amended to read:
673.610. ORS 673.605 to 673.740 do not apply to:
(1) Any  full- or part-time employee hired to fill a permanent position, who in connection with
the duties as an employee has the incidental duty of preparing  income tax returns for the business
of the employer only.
(2) Any attorney at law rendering services in the performance of the duties  of an attorney at
law.
(3) While acting as such, any fiduciary, or the regular employees thereof,  acting on behalf of the
fiduciary estate, the testator, trustor, grantor, or beneficiaries thereof.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-A) Page 6
(4) A certified public accountant who holds an active license  issued by any state, a public ac-
countant holding a valid license issued under ORS 673.100  or a public accounting firm registered in
any state.
(5) Any employee of a certified  public accountant, public accountant or registered public ac-
counting firm described in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) Any person employed by  a local, state or federal governmental agency but only in perform-
ance of official duties.
(7) An enrolled agent.
(8) Any employee of an enrolled agent, while acting within  the scope of that employment
and under the supervision of the enrolled agent.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 673.615 is amended to read:
673.615. Except as otherwise provided in ORS 673.605 to 673.740:
(1) A person may not prepare or advise or assist in the preparation  of personal income tax re-
turns for another and  for valuable consideration or represent that the person is so engaged unless
the person is licensed as a tax consultant under ORS 673.605 to 673.740.
(2) A tax preparer may prepare or advise or assist in the preparation of  tax returns only under
the supervision of a tax consultant, or a person described in ORS 673.610 [ (2) or (4) ] (2), (4) or (7) ,
and subject to such  conditions and limitations as the State Board of Tax Practitioners by rule may
impose.
(3) A registered tax aide may assist a tax consultant in the preparation of tax  returns only un-
der the supervision of a tax consultant  and subject to such conditions and limitations as the board
by rule may impose.
(4) A person may not  be a facilitator of a refund anticipation loan without first being issued a
license as a tax consultant or tax preparer under ORS 673.640.
(5) A tax consultant may employ and  supervise no more than two registered tax aides at the
same time under the conditions and limitations prescribed by the board by rule.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 673.625 is amended to read:
673.625. (1) Every applicant for a license as a tax consultant and every applicant for  licensing
as a tax preparer must:
(a) Be 18 years of age or older;
(b) Possess a high school diploma or a modified diploma or have  passed an equivalency exam-
ination;
(c) Present evidence satisfactory to the State Board of Tax Practitioners that the  applicant has
successfully  completed  at least 80 hours in basic personal income tax law, theory and practice at
a school training session or educational institution approved by the board; and
(d) Possess a preparer tax identification number issued by the Internal Revenue Service.
(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, every applicant for  licensing
as a tax preparer  must pass to the satisfaction of the board an examination. The examination must
be constructed in a manner that in the judgment of the board measures  the applicant’s knowledge
of Oregon and federal personal income tax law, theory and practice.
(3) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, every applicant for  licensing
as a tax consultant must:
(a) Present evidence satisfactory to the  board of active employment, as described in ORS 673.615
(2), as a tax preparer  or employment in this or another state in a capacity that is, in the judgment
of the board  equivalent to that of a tax preparer or tax consultant, for not less than a cumulative
total of 1,100 hours during at least two of the last five  years. The board shall consider certification
by a tax consultant or person described in ORS 673.610 [ (2) or (4) ] (2), (4) or (7)  that  the applicant
was employed as  a tax preparer under supervision for the period indicated in the certificate to be
satisfactory evidence of the applicant’s  employment as a tax preparer for the period indicated. If
an applicant has worked less than a cumulative  total of 1,100 hours in at least two of the last five
years, the board may consider the number of hours employed,  the number of years employed, the
number of tax returns prepared and whether the  work involved contributed directly to the profes-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-A) Page 7
sional competence of the  individual in determining if a tax preparer or tax consultant has met the
work experience requirement.
(b) Pass to the satisfaction of the board an examination that is  constructed in a manner that in
the judgment of  the board measures the applicant’s knowledge of Oregon and federal personal in-
come tax law, theory and practice. The examination for a tax consultant’s license must  be of a more
exacting nature and require higher standards of knowledge of  personal income tax law, theory and
practice than the examination for a tax preparer’s license.
(4) If, in the judgment of the board,  an applicant has, in combination, the education and expe-
rience to qualify for a tax consultant’s  or preparer’s license, but does not meet or cannot present
evidence of strict  compliance with the requirements of subsection (1)(c) or subsection (3)(a) of this
section, the board may allow some of the applicant’s education or experience to substitute one for
the other.  However, this subsection does not allow a waiver of, or substitution for, any qualifications
needed for a tax consultant’s or  preparer’s license other than those described in subsection (1)(c)
or subsection (3)(a) of this section.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 673.637 is amended to read:
673.637. (1) The State Board of  Tax Practitioners may issue a license to an applicant for a li-
cense as a tax consultant or as a tax preparer who:
(a) Presents evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is licensed as a tax  consultant
or preparer in a state that has  requirements for licensing substantially similar to the requirements
for licensing in this state; and
(b) Has passed to the satisfaction of the board an examination covering Oregon  personal income
tax law, theory and practice, the provisions of ORS 673.605  to 673.740 and the code of professional
conduct prescribed by the board.
[(2) Notwithstanding ORS 673.625 (1) and (3), but as  otherwise provided in ORS 673.605 to
673.740, the board  shall license as a tax consultant any person who is, on the date of the application
for a tax  consultant’s license, enrolled to practice before the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to 31
C.F.R. part 10 if the person  has passed to the satisfaction of the board an examination covering Oregon
personal income tax law, theory and practice, the provisions of ORS 673.605 to  673.740 and the code
of professional conduct prescribed by the board. ]
[(3)] (2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an examination is not required for licens-
ing under this section.
[(4)] (3) Any person desiring to be licensed under this section shall make  written application to
the board and shall pay to the board at the  time required by the board the examination and license
fees provided by rule of the board.
(4) The board shall register as an enrolled agent any individual who:
(a) Is an enrolled agent;
(b) Applies for registration in the manner provided by the board by rule; and
(c) Pays the registration fee established under ORS 673.685.
(5) The board may not require an  enrolled agent registered under this section to pass any
examination administered or required by the board, or  to complete continuing education
under ORS 673.655, as a condition of initial registration or renewal.
(6) An enrolled agent who is not licensed as a tax consultant or tax preparer  under ORS
673.640 may not prepare, advise or assist in the preparation of personal income tax returns
for another and for valuable consideration in this state unless the  enrolled agent is regis-
tered with the board under this section.
(7) The board may refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend or  revoke, a registration as
an enrolled agent under this section on any grounds described in ORS 673.700  that apply to
tax consultants if the board determines the grounds are reasonably  applicable to the conduct
of an enrolled agent.
(8) A registered enrolled agent has the authority to  represent taxpayers before the De-
partment of Revenue to the same extent as a licensed Oregon tax consultant.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 673.685 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-A) Page 8
673.685. (1) The State Board of Tax Practitioners shall adopt by rule fees for:
(a) Application for examination for a tax consultant’s license.
(b) Application for examination for a tax preparer’s license.
(c) Issuance or renewal of a tax consultant’s license.
(d) Issuance or renewal of a tax preparer’s license.
(e) Issuance or renewal of a registered tax aide’s certificate.
(f) Issuance or renewal of a tax consultant’s inactive license.
(g) Issuance or renewal of a tax preparer’s inactive license.
(h) Reactivation of a  tax consultant’s inactive license or reactivation of a tax preparer’s inactive
license.
(i) Restoration of lapsed license.
(j) Issuance or replacement of a duplicate license or certificate.
(k) Registration or registration renewal  for a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation or
other legal entity.
(L) Issuance or renewal of a combined  tax consultant’s or tax preparer’s license and registration
for a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation or other legal entity. Eligibility for a combined
license shall be determined under rules adopted by the board.
(m) Annual registration  of a branch office of a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation or
other legal entity.
(n) Issuance or renewal of a registration for an enrolled agent as described  in ORS
673.637.
(2) The fees established by the State Board of Tax Practitioners under this  section are subject
to the prior approval of  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services. The fees may not exceed
the cost of administering the regulatory program  of the State Board of Tax Practitioners pertaining
to the purposes for which the fees are established, as authorized by the Legislative Assembly  within
the board’s budget, as that budget may be modified by the Emergency Board.
SECTION 19.
This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate February 24, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-A) Page 9